testing/sma-adj.yaml
  Adjective - njoetjeles: # 
    njoetjeles+A+Attr: njoetjeles 
    njoetjeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [njoetjelabpa, njoetjelåbpoe]
    njoetjeles+A+Sg+Nom: [njoetjeles, njoetjele]
    njoetjeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njoetjelommes

  Adjective - njoetseldh: # 
    njoetseldh+A+Sg+Nom: njoetseldh 

  Adjective - njåajjan: # 
    njåajjan+A+Attr: njåajjan 
    njåajjan+A+Sg+Nom: njåajjan 

  Adjective - njåajjoeh: # 
    njåajjoeh+A+Attr: njåajjoeh 
    njåajjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: njåajjan 

  Adjective - njåålkehke: # 
    njåålkehke+A+Attr: njåålkehke 
    njåålkehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [njåålkehkabpa, njåålkehkåbpoe]
    njåålkehke+A+Sg+Nom: njåålkehke 
    njåålkehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njåålkehkommes

  Adjective - noere: # c 
    noere+A+Attr: noere 
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nuerebe, nuerebe]
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere 
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nööremes

  Adjective - nuarvan: # 
    nuarvan+A+Sg+Nom: nuarvan 

  Adjective - nåajsan: # 
    nåajsan+A+Attr: nåajsan 
    nåajsan+A+Sg+Nom: nåajsan 

  Adjective - nåake: # c 
    nåake+A+Attr: nåake 
    nåake+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nåakebe, vearrebe, vïerrebe]
    nåake+A+Sg+Nom: nåake 
    nåake+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nåakemes, vearremes, vïerremes, vïerremes]

  Adjective - nåekies: # 
    nåekies+A+Attr: nåekies 
    nåekies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nåekebe 
    nåekies+A+Sg+Nom: nåekie 
    nåekies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nåekemes

  Adjective - nåmhpoeh: # 
    nåmhpoeh+A+Attr: nåmhpoeh 
    nåmhpoeh+A+Sg+Nom: [nåmhpan, nåmhpoeh]

  Adjective - nænnoes: # c 
    nænnoes+A+Attr: [nænnoes, nænnoes]
    nænnoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nænnobe, nænnebe, nænnoesabpa, nænnoesåbpoe]
    nænnoes+A+Sg+Nom: [nænnoe, nænnos, nænnoes]
    nænnoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nænnomes, nænnemes, nænnoesommes]

  Adjective - ohtje: # c 
    ohtje+A+Attr: ohtjee 
    ohtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ohtjeebe 
    ohtje+A+Sg+Nom: ohtjee 
    ohtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ohtjeemes

  Adjective - oktegs: # 
    oktegs+A+Attr: oktegs 
    oktegs+A+Sg+Nom: oktegs 

  Adjective - onne: # c 
    onne+A+Attr: onne 
    onne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: unnebe 
    onne+A+Sg+Nom: [onne, unnie]
    onne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: unnemes

  Adjective - orre: # c 
    orre+A+Attr: orre 
    orre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: urrebe 
    orre+A+Sg+Nom: orre 
    orre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: urremes

  Adjective - ovluhpehts: # 
    ovluhpehts+A+Attr: ovluhpehts 
    ovluhpehts+A+Sg+Nom: [ovluhpehte, ovluhpehts]

  Adjective - ovmese: # 
    ovmese+A+Attr: ovmese 

  Adjective - ovmessie: # 
    ovmessie+A+Attr: ovmessie 

  Adjective - ovnohkens: # 
    ovnohkens+A+Attr: ovnohkens 
    ovnohkens+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ovnohkenabpa, ovnohkenåbpoe]
    ovnohkens+A+Sg+Nom: [ovnohkene, ovnohkens]
    ovnohkens+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ovnohkenommes

  Adjective - ovnuvhtege: # 
    ovnuvhtege+A+Attr: ovnuvhtege 
    ovnuvhtege+A+Sg+Nom: ovnuvhtege 

  Adjective - ovvïssjeles: # 
    ovvïssjeles+A+Attr: [ovvïssjeles, ovvïssjele]
    ovvïssjeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ovvïssjelabpa, ovvïssjelåbpoe]
    ovvïssjeles+A+Sg+Nom: [ovvïssjeles, ovvïssjele]
    ovvïssjeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ovvïssjelommes

  Adjective - plaave: # 
    plaave+A+Attr: plaave 
    plaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [plaevebe, plaevebe]
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaave, plaaves]
    plaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plaavemes

  Adjective - pleasoeh: # 
    pleasoeh+A+Attr: pleasoeh 
    pleasoeh+A+Sg+Nom: pleasan 

  Adjective - pliejhkies: # 
    pliejhkies+A+Attr: [pliejhkies, pliejhkies]
    pliejhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkebe, pliejhkiesabpa, pliejhkiesåbpoe]
    pliejhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkie, pliejhkies, pliejhkies]
    pliejhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkemes, pliejhkiesommes]

  Adjective - plievhties: # 
    plievhties+A+Attr: plievhties 
    plievhties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: plievhtebe 
    plievhties+A+Sg+Nom: [plievhtie, plievhties]
    plievhties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plievhtemes

  Adjective - plïehtje: # 
    plïehtje+A+Attr: plïehtje 
    plïehtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: plïehtjebe 
    plïehtje+A+Sg+Nom: plïehtjes 
    plïehtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plïehtjemes

  Adjective - praare: # 
    praare+A+Attr: praare 
    praare+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [praarebe, praaresabpa, praaresåbpoe]
    praare+A+Sg+Nom: [praares, praares]
    praare+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [praaremes, praaresommes]

  Adjective - prarrohke: # 
    prarrohke+A+Attr: prarrohke 
    prarrohke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [prarroehkabpa, prarroehkåbpoe]
    prarrohke+A+Sg+Nom: prarrohke 
    prarrohke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: prarroehkommes

  Adjective - provne: # 
    provne+A+Attr: provne 
    provne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: provnebe 
    provne+A+Sg+Nom: provnes 
    provne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: provnemes

  Adjective - pruvres: # 
    pruvres+A+Attr: pruvres 
    pruvres+A+Sg+Nom: pruvres 

  Adjective - raavtehtje: # 
    raavtehtje+A+Attr: raavtehtje 
    raavtehtje+A+Sg+Nom: raavtehtje 

  Adjective - raavteres: # 
    raavteres+A+Attr: raavteres 
    raavteres+A+Sg+Nom: [raavteres, raavtere]

  Adjective - radtjoes: # 
    radtjoes+A+Attr: radtjoes 
    radtjoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [radtjahkabpa, radtjahkåbpoe]
    radtjoes+A+Sg+Nom: radtjoes 
    radtjoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: radtjahkommes

  Adjective - raeffies: # 
    raeffies+A+Attr: raeffies 
    raeffies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: raeffebe 
    raeffies+A+Sg+Nom: [raeffie, raeffies]
    raeffies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: raeffemes

  Adjective - raejnies: # 
    raejnies+A+Attr: raejnies 
    raejnies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: raejnebe 
    raejnies+A+Sg+Nom: [raejnie, raejnies]
    raejnies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: raejnemes

  Adjective - riejries: # 
    riejries+A+Attr: riejries 
    riejries+A+Sg+Nom: riejries 

  Adjective - rovnegs: # 
    rovnegs+A+Attr: rovnegs 
    rovnegs+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rovnegabpa, rovnegåbpoe]
    rovnegs+A+Sg+Nom: [rovnege, rovnegs]
    rovnegs+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rovnegommes

  Adjective - rudtjege: # 
    rudtjege+A+Attr: rudtjege 
    rudtjege+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rudtjebe, rudtjegabpa, rudtjegåbpoe]
    rudtjege+A+Sg+Nom: [rudtje, rudtjege]
    rudtjege+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rudtjemes, rudtjegommes]

  Adjective - rupmies: # 
    rupmies+A+Attr: rupmies 
    rupmies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rupmebe 
    rupmies+A+Sg+Nom: [rupmie, rupmies]
    rupmies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rupmemes

  Adjective - rutjkehke: # 
    rutjkehke+A+Attr: rutjkehke 
    rutjkehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rutjkehkabpa, rutjkehkåbpoe]
    rutjkehke+A+Sg+Nom: rutjkehke 
    rutjkehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rutjkehkommes

  Adjective - rutjkes: # 
    rutjkes+A+Attr: rutjkes 
    rutjkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rutjkesabpa, rutjkesåbpoe, rutjkbe]
    rutjkes+A+Sg+Nom: rutjkes 
    rutjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rutjkesommes, rutjkmes]

  Adjective - ræjhkoes: # 
    ræjhkoes+A+Attr: ræjhkoes 
    ræjhkoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ræjhkoesabpa, ræjhkoesåbpoe]
    ræjhkoes+A+Sg+Nom: ræjhkoes 
    ræjhkoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ræjhkoesommes

  Adjective - rïekte: # 
    rïekte+A+Attr: rïekte 
    rïekte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rïektebe, rïektesabpa, rïektesåbpoe]
    rïekte+A+Sg+Nom: rïektes 
    rïekte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rïektemes, rïektesommes]

  Adjective - rïektes: # 
    rïektes+A+Attr: rïekte 
    rïektes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rïektebe 
    rïektes+A+Sg+Nom: rïektes 
    rïektes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rïektemes

  Adjective - rööpses: # 
    rööpses+A+Attr: rööpses 
    rööpses+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ruepsebe, ruepsebe]
    rööpses+A+Sg+Nom: rööpses 
    rööpses+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rööpsemes, rööpsemes]

  Adjective - saavrehke: # 
    saavrehke+A+Attr: saavrehke 
    saavrehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [saavrehkabpa, saavrehkåbpoe]
    saavrehke+A+Sg+Nom: saavrehke 
    saavrehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: saavrehkommes

  Adjective - sablehtje: # 
    sablehtje+A+Attr: sablehtje 
    sablehtje+A+Sg+Nom: sablehtje 

  Adjective - saejkies: # 
    saejkies+A+Attr: saejkies 
    saejkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: saejkebe 
    saejkies+A+Sg+Nom: [saejkie, saejkies]
    saejkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: saejkemes

  Adjective - saelhties: # 
    saelhties+A+Attr: saelhties 
    saelhties+A+Sg+Nom: [saelhtie, saelhtes]

  Adjective - seadtoes: # c 
    seadtoes+A+Attr: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seadtoesabpa, seadtoesåbpoe]
    seadtoes+A+Sg+Nom: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: seadtoesommes

  Adjective - seakoes: # 
    seakoes+A+Attr: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seakoesabpa, seakoesåbpoe]
    seakoes+A+Sg+Nom: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: seakoesommes

  Adjective - seammaplïeres: # 
    seammaplïeres+A+Attr: seammaplïeres 

  Adjective - seatadihks: # 
    seatadihks+A+Attr: seatadihks 
    seatadihks+A+Sg+Nom: seatadihks 

  Adjective - siegkies: # 
    siegkies+A+Attr: siegkies 
    siegkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: siegkebe 
    siegkies+A+Sg+Nom: [siegkie, siegkies]
    siegkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: siegkemes

  Adjective - sieties: # 
    sieties+A+Attr: sieties 
    sieties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sietebe 
    sieties+A+Sg+Nom: [sietie, sieties]
    sieties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sietemes

  Adjective - sjeavodh: # 
    sjeavodh+A+Attr: sjeavodh 
    sjeavodh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sjeavoedabpa, sjeavoedåbpoe]
    sjeavodh+A+Sg+Nom: sjeavodh 
    sjeavodh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjeavoedommes

  Adjective - sjeavohth: # 
    sjeavohth+A+Attr: sjeavohth 
    sjeavohth+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sjeavoehtabpa, sjeavoehtåbpoe]
    sjeavohth+A+Sg+Nom: sjeavohth 
    sjeavohth+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjeavoehtommes

  Adjective - sjiehteles: # 
    sjiehteles+A+Attr: sjiehteles 
    sjiehteles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sjiehtielabpa, sjiehtielåbpoe]
    sjiehteles+A+Sg+Nom: [sjiehteles, sjiehtele]
    sjiehteles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjiehtielommes

  Adjective - sjuevnjeds: # 
    sjuevnjeds+A+Attr: sjuevnjeds 
    sjuevnjeds+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sjuevnjiedabpa, sjuevnjiedåbpoe]
    sjuevnjeds+A+Sg+Nom: [sjuevnjede, sjuevnjeds]
    sjuevnjeds+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjuevnjiedommes

  Adjective - sjyjjehke: # 
    sjyjjehke+A+Attr: sjyjjehke 
    sjyjjehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sjyjjehkabpa, sjyjjehkåbpoe]
    sjyjjehke+A+Sg+Nom: sjyjjehke 
    sjyjjehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjyjjehkommes

  Adjective - sjïere: # 
    sjïere+A+Attr: sjïere 
    sjïere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sjïerebe 
    sjïere+A+Sg+Nom: sjïere 
    sjïere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjïeremes

  Adjective - skaavhtege: # 
    skaavhtege+A+Attr: skaavhtege 
    skaavhtege+A+Sg+Nom: skaavhtege 

  Adjective - skuallah: # 
    skuallah+A+Attr: skuallah 
    skuallah+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [skuallakabpa, skuallakåbpoe]
    skuallah+A+Sg+Nom: [skuallan, skualla]
    skuallah+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: skuallakommes

  Adjective - skualloeh: # 
    skualloeh+A+Attr: skualloeh 
    skualloeh+A+Sg+Nom: skuallan 

  Adjective - skïemtje: # 
    skïemtje+A+Attr: skïemtje 
    skïemtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [skïemtjebe, skïemtjesabpa, skïemtjesåbpoe]
    skïemtje+A+Sg+Nom: skïemtjes 
    skïemtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [skïemtjemes, skïemtjesommes]

  Adjective - slahtjan: # 
    slahtjan+A+Attr: slahtjan 
    slahtjan+A+Sg+Nom: slahtjan 

  Adjective - sleagran: # 
    sleagran+A+Attr: sleagran 
    sleagran+A+Sg+Nom: sleagran 

  Adjective - sleehpeldihkie: # 
    sleehpeldihkie+A+Attr: sleehpeldihkie 
    sleehpeldihkie+A+Sg+Nom: sleehpeldihkie 

  Adjective - slovves: # 
    slovves+A+Attr: slovves 
    slovves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [slovvesabpa, slovvesåbpoe]
    slovves+A+Sg+Nom: slovves 
    slovves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: slovvesommes

  Adjective - smaave: # 
    smaave+A+Attr: smaave 
    smaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [smaevebe, smaevebe]
    smaave+A+Sg+Nom: smaave 
    smaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [smaevemes, smaevemes]

  Adjective - sneehpes: # c 
    sneehpes+A+Attr: [sneehpes, sneehpes]
    sneehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sneehpebe, sneehpesabpa, sneehpesåbpoe, snaebpebe]
    sneehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [sneehpes, sneehpes]
    sneehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [sneehpemes, sneehpesommes]

  Adjective - snjaltje: # 
    snjaltje+A+Attr: snjaltje 

  Adjective - snjåhtjoeh: # 
    snjåhtjoeh+A+Attr: snjåhtjoeh 
    snjåhtjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: snjåhtjan 

  Adjective - snååhpehke: # 
    snååhpehke+A+Attr: snååhpehke 
    snååhpehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [snååhpehkabpa, snååhpehkåbpoe]
    snååhpehke+A+Sg+Nom: snååhpehke 
    snååhpehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: snååhpehkommes

  Adjective - spaajhte: # 
    spaajhte+A+Attr: spaajhte 
    spaajhte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: spaajhtebe 
    spaajhte+A+Sg+Nom: spaajhte 
    spaajhte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: spaajhtemes
